Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 2. Kidnapping and Related Offenses

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

§ 6-2-201.
Kidnapping; penalties; effect of release of victim.

A person is guilty of kidnapping if he unlawfully removes another from his place of residence or business or from the vicinity where he was at the time of the removal, or if he unlawfully confines another person, with the intent to:

Hold for ransom or reward, or as a shield or hostage;

Facilitate the commission of a felony; or

Inflict bodily injury on or to terrorize the victim or another.

A removal or confinement is unlawful if it is accomplished:

By force, threat or deception; or

Without the consent of a parent, guardian or other person responsible for the general supervision of an individual who is under the age of fourteen (14) or who is adjudicated incompetent.

If the defendant voluntarily releases the victim substantially unharmed and in a safe place prior to trial, kidnapping is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than twenty (20) years.

If the defendant does not voluntarily release the victim substantially unharmed and in a safe place prior to trial, kidnapping is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not less than twenty (20) years or for life except as provided in W.S.

6-2-101

.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Removal.—

Nothing in the plain meaning of the word “remove” or the kidnapping statute itself requires physical contact for purposes of establishing “removal;” the statute also deems a removal unlawful if accomplished without the consent of a parent, which was the State’s theory that was adequately proven, as the child victim was five at the time and his mother testified she did not know defendant and did not give him permission to take the child. Winters v. State, 2019 WY 76, 446 P.3d 191,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2019).

Crimes not required to be merged for sentencing.—

Kidnapping and first-degree sexual abuse of a minor each require an element the other does not, as the former requires sexual intrusion, whereas the latter does not, and that the kidnapping charge referred to the sexual abuse charge was of no moment, as the jury was not required to find every element of sexual abuse to convict defendant of kidnapping, and the jury had to find only that defendant removed the child victim with the intent to commit sexual abuse. Double jeopardy did not require the sentences to be merged. Winters v. State, 2019 WY 76, 446 P.3d 191,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2019).

“Removal from vicinity” cannot refer to locational changes within victim's residence or business.

See Keene v. State, 812 P.2d 147,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1991).

Lawful removal. —

A father, taking his child out of the state with the child's and the child's mother's consent in order that the child may not be present in a criminal trial in which it had been subpoenaed as a witness, is not guilty of kidnapping. John v. State, 6 Wyo. 203, 44 P. 51,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1896).

Where husband had abandoned his wife and family and made no objection, though knowing that she was sending their child into another state, wife is not guilty of kidnapping; he having abandoned the child and given an implied consent to the child's removal. Biggs v. State, 13 Wyo. 94, 77 P. 901,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1904).

No durational requirement for confinement period. —

There is no durational requirement for the period of confinement for purposes of this section, and where the evidence showed that defendant forcibly intercepted his ex-wife in her truck, confined her within the vehicle and removed her to his house, the time spent in the truck or in the house sufficiently constituted confinement. Doud v. State, 845 P.2d 402,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1993).

Kidnapping conviction was proper, even though the victims were, at various times, out in the community and therefore not confined; no specific time period is required to satisfy the element of confinement. Moore v. State, 2003 WY 153, 80 P.3d 191,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 2003).

Sentence.—

Because the amended kidnapping sentence that defendant challenged was not a statute, it was not an improper ex post facto law.
Hawes v. State, 2016 WY 30, 368 P.3d 879,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 2016 WY 30,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2016).

Double jeopardy violation.—

Defendant’s convictions and sentences for two counts of kidnapping violated double jeopardy because the evidence was insufficient to show that two kidnappings occurred, as the evidence did not support the State’s position that the victim regained her liberty when she was allowed to clean her mouth in the kitchen before defendant removed the victim from the home and put her in the backseat of her car. Volpi v. State, 2018 WY 66, 419 P.3d 884,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2018).

Use of expert to explain behavior. —

Expert on battered women's testimony was admissible in trial for battery and kidnapping where the expert's testimony was an explanation for the victim's irrational behavior in answer to defendant's specific defenses that her behavior proved he had not battered or kidnapped her. Kenyon v. State, 2004 WY 100, 96 P.3d 1016,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. Sept. 29, 2004), cert. denied, 543 U.S. 1175, 125 S. Ct. 1389, 161 L. Ed. 2d 158, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 1883 (U.S. 2005).

Reward. —

The reward requirement of this section as an element of the crime of kidnapping can consist of freedom from arrest, obtaining prescription drugs, publicity or any other benefaction to defendant. Edge v. State, 647 P.2d 557,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 350

(Wyo. 1982).

Evidence sufficient—

Where the evidence showed that defendant abducted a victim at gunpoint, handcuffed the victim inside of a car, committed nonconsensual sexual acts upon the victim, and transported the victim without consent, there was sufficient evidence to convict defendant of kidnapping, first-degree sexual assault, and third-degree sexual assault. Dean v. State, 2003 WY 128, 77 P.3d 692,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2003).

Evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant's aggravated burglary and kidnapping convictions because the victim testified that defendant was “jealous,” and if he got into the house, “he was going to be very upset,” and defendant violently broke in through the back door, smashing glass, and breaking parts of the door jamb; he carried a knife. He pursued the victim when she escaped, he forcibly returned her to the house, and held her in her basement bedroom.
Counts v. State, 2012 WY 70, 277 P.3d 94,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2012).

Sufficient evidence supported defendant’s kidnapping conviction; defendant moved the child victim from the bowling alley and then across the river, and the two did not simply spontaneously arrive at the river, but defendant lured the child there and then carried him across the river. Defendant gained the child’s trust at the bowling alley, lured him to the river by telling him he would show him his camp, and deliberately carried him across the river to a secluded area to sexually abuse him. Winters v. State, 2019 WY 76, 446 P.3d 191,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2019).

Evidence was
sufficient to convict defendant of kidnapping because defendant confined
the victim in her home, forcing her to remain there in several locations
- the bathroom, the bedroom, and eventually the living room; during
the entire time, he had his hands around her neck or her body, rendering
her unable to seek the usual protections of society; defendant ended
the confinement only when he became aware that the victim had called
the police; there was no evidence suggesting that the confinement
would have ended had the victim not been able to contact law enforcement;
and defendant intended to inflict bodily injury on or to terrorize
the victim, as he did so by choking, body-slamming and punching her. Dockter v. State, 2017 WY 63, 396 P.3d 405,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 2017).

False imprisonment is a lesser-included offense of kidnapping. —

False imprisonment is a lesser-included offense of kidnapping; however, a trial court did not err by refusing to give such an instruction where the evidence did not support a conviction for false imprisonment. Dean v. State, 2003 WY 128, 77 P.3d 692,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2003).

Assault, battery and reckless endangering not lesser included offenses. —

According to the strict test of “element identity” in Balsley v. State, 668 P.2d 1324,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1983) simple assault, battery and reckless endangering are not lesser included offenses of the crimes of aggravated robbery or kidnapping. Amin v. State, 694 P.2d 119,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 438

(Wyo. 1985).

Defendant's prosecution for attempted kidnapping, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 6-1-301(a)(i) and

6-2-201

, was not barred by the doctrine of double jeopardy due to defendant's earlier guilty plea to battery because battery, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-501(b), was not a lesser-included offense of attempted kidnapping under the same-elements test.
Rathbun v. State, 2011 WY 116, 257 P.3d 29,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2011).

Kidnapping and sexual assault did not merge. —

The force used to accomplish the kidnapping was sufficient justification to enhance the penalty for aggravated kidnapping where it was separate and distinct from the force and confinement the defendant imposed upon the victim, and where there were repeated sexual assaults in his vehicle, this was not an instance that would demand merger of the sexual assaults with the independent crime of aggravated kidnapping. McDermott v. State, 870 P.2d 339,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1994), overruled, Jones v. State, 902 P.2d 686,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1995).

Crimes not required to be merged for sentencing. —

Where appellant pointed pistol at victims and exhibited shotgun in course of kidnapping victims and appropriating their truck and trailer rig, crimes of aggravated assault and battery, aggravated robbery, and kidnapping were not required to be merged for sentencing purposes. Rouse v. State, 966 P.2d 967,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1998), overruled in part, Sweets v. State, 2013 WY 98, 307 P.3d 860,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2013).

Subsection (c) does not create lesser included offense, but describes mitigating circumstances

rather than elements of the offense. Loomer v. State, 768 P.2d 1042,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1989), limited, Snyder v. State, 912 P.2d 1127,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1996).

Subsection (c) provides for lesser sentence if four conditions are established:

(1) the defendant voluntarily releases the victim, (2) substantially unharmed, (3) in a safe place, (4) prior to trial. If any of these four conditions are not met, the lesser-sentence provision is not applicable. Loomer v. State, 768 P.2d 1042,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1989), limited, Snyder v. State, 912 P.2d 1127,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1996).

And burden on defendant to present evidence. —

The defendant has the burden of going forward with evidence to show that he voluntarily released the victim unharmed in a safe place. Loomer v. State, 768 P.2d 1042,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1989), limited, Snyder v. State, 912 P.2d 1127,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1996).

Once evidence presented, issue submitted to jury. —

In light of the express factual conditions set out in this section, the legislature apparently intended that the discretion of the sentencing court be limited. Therefore, the question of whether the defendant voluntarily released the victim unharmed in a safe place should be submitted to the jury when the evidence presented raises the issue. Loomer v. State, 768 P.2d 1042,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1989), limited, Snyder v. State, 912 P.2d 1127,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1996).

Defendants, charged with kidnapping prison officials, could not claim duress or coercion

because they presented no evidence that: (1) they were faced with a specific threat of death, forcible sexual attack or substantial bodily injury in the immediate future; (2) there was not time for complaint to the authorities, or that such a complaint would have been futile; and (3) there was no opportunity to resort to the courts to redress their grievances. Amin v. State, 811 P.2d 255,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 1991).

Admission of uncharged misconduct. —

Trial court did not abuse its discretion in admitting evidence in defendant's trial for murder and kidnapping of prior uncharged misconduct evidence from his former wife and a friend of his. Their evidence showing the course of conduct between defendant and both victims was relevant to rebut defendant's defenses to the charge and to tell the jury the entire sequence of events that led to the kidnapping and murder. Kenyon v. State, 2004 WY 100, 96 P.3d 1016,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. Sept. 29, 2004), cert. denied, 543 U.S. 1175, 125 S. Ct. 1389, 161 L. Ed. 2d 158, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 1883 (U.S. 2005).

Erroneous instruction, shifting burden of proof, harmless. —

A jury instruction placing with the state the burden of proving that the defendant did not voluntarily release the victim unharmed in a safe place was harmless error, since the instruction, as given, could only have been of benefit to the defendant. Loomer v. State, 768 P.2d 1042,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1989), limited, Snyder v. State, 912 P.2d 1127,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1996).

Jury instruction erroneous. —

Kidnapping convictions under this section were reversed because a district court failed to instruct the jury that the larceny committed had to be a felony.
Gabbert v. State, 2006 WY 108, 141 P.3d 690,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 2006), reh'g denied,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. Sept. 26, 2006).

Consistency of case theories in jury instructions. —

Even though the bilateral theory of conspiracy was given to the jury in defendant's first trial, Wyoming follows the majority of states in applying the unilateral theory to the crime of conspiracy, and the court correctly instructed the jury on that theory in defendant's second trial. Miller v. State, 955 P.2d 892,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1998).

No double jeopardy violation

in prosecution for conspiracy to commit rape since the conduct constituting the crime of conspiracy is separate and apart from the conduct that makes up the substantive offenses of rape and kidnapping. Phillips v. State, 835 P.2d 1062,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. July 8, 1992).

A substantive crime, and a conspiracy to commit that crime, are not the same offense for double jeopardy purposes, and the fact that there is a mere overlap of proof between two prosecutions does not establish a double jeopardy violation. Harvey v. State, 835 P.2d 1074,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. July 8, 1992), cert. denied, 506 U.S. 1022, 113 S. Ct. 661, 121 L. Ed. 2d 586, 1992 U.S. LEXIS 7732 (U.S. 1992).

Prosecutor may make argument about victim's level of fear. —

Prosecutorial argument that victim had been kidnapped for the entire time she was in a relationship with defendant because of his control over her was not misconduct where the victim had not left the apartment during the kidnapping although the doors had been unlocked, and in attempting to explain this behavior, the prosecutor made such argument as an attempt to assist the jury in understanding the victim's level of fear and resulting behavior. Kenyon v. State, 2004 WY 100, 96 P.3d 1016,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. Sept. 29, 2004), cert. denied, 543 U.S. 1175, 125 S. Ct. 1389, 161 L. Ed. 2d 158, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 1883 (U.S. 2005).

Confinement of victim during robbery and burglary constitutes kidnapping. —

The defendant's actions constituted kidnapping where he confined the victim to the bedroom of her home to facilitate his escape from the commission of a robbery and burglary. The gravamen of the crime of kidnapping is the unlawful confinement of the victim and the confinement in this case could not be considered incident and integral to the other crimes and, therefore, was a separate crime. Darrow v. State, 824 P.2d 1269,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1992).

Verbal threats sufficient to terrorize. —

Defendant's verbal threats to kill his ex-wife after removing her from her truck and restraining her in his home constituted terrorizing, regardless of whether he was wielding a gun at the time. Doud v. State, 845 P.2d 402,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1993).

The legislature intended separate punishments

for the crime of aggravated kidnapping and for the crime of sexual assault in the first degree because, once the sexual assault is inflicted, the victim has been harmed and cannot be released “substantially unharmed.” McDermott v. State, 870 P.2d 339,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1994), overruled, Jones v. State, 902 P.2d 686,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1995).

No mitigating circumstances for attempted kidnapping. —

Trial court properly applied the appropriate penalty range in sentencing defendant to life in prison after defendant was convicted of attempted kidnapping because where there was not a completed kidnapping, but instead an attempted kidnapping, the mitigating circumstances described in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-201(c) could not occur.
Rathbun v. State, 2011 WY 116, 257 P.3d 29,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2011).

Kidnapping statute was not unconstitutionally vague. —

Where the kidnapping statute, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-201

, prohibited the unlawful removal of a person from the area in which the person was occupied and the unlawful holding of a person within a location, the statute was not unconstitutionally vague, because any individual of ordinary intelligence would be on notice that the individual's acts were illegal under the statute. Alcalde v. State, 2003 WY 99, 74 P.3d 1253,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2003).

Admissibility of evidence. —

In a trial for defendant's attempt to kidnap his estranged fiancée, defendant was not entitled to present evidence of the victim's past sexual conduct at times that she was intoxicated. The trial court properly found the evidence was not relevant, despite defendant's argument that it showed his intent to protect, not harm, the victim; further, other evidence of the victim's self-endangering proclivities was before the jury.
Silva v. State, 2012 WY 37, 271 P.3d 443,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2012), reh'g denied,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. Apr. 10, 2012).

Voluntary release not shown.—

Defendant was not entitled to mitigation in relation to a kidnapping conviction because he did not voluntarily release a victim when she cut her own feet free and ran from the house with defendant in pursuit. Hawes v. State, 2014 WY 127, 335 P.3d 1073,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2014), cert. denied, 576 U.S. 1025, 135 S. Ct. 2846, 192 L. Ed. 2d 882, 2015 U.S. LEXIS 3929 (U.S. 2015).

False imprisonment not a lesser-included offense of kidnapping. —

In a trial for attempted kidnapping by removal, defendant was not entitled to an instruction on the lesser-included misdemeanor offense of attempted false imprisonment because attempted false imprisonment is not a lesser-included offense to attempt to commit kidnapping where the purported criminal conduct involved only an attempted removal of the victim with the intent to inflict bodily injury on or to terrorize her.
Silva v. State, 2012 WY 37, 271 P.3d 443,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2012), reh'g denied,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. Apr. 10, 2012).

Jury instruction not erroneous. —

District court did not violate a clear and unequivocal rule of law by failing to instruct the jury on defendant's belatedly proposed incidental rule as neither Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-201

(2015) nor case law clearly established a rule beyond the elements of the kidnapping statute. Vaught v. State, 2016 WY 7, 366 P.3d 512,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2016).

Applied

in

Stinehart v. State, 727 P.2d 1010,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 637

(Wyo. 1986).

Quoted

in

Deshazer v. State, 2003 WY 98, 74 P.3d 1240,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2003).

Stated

in

Brooks v. State, 706 P.2d 664,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 564

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Daniel v. State, 644 P.2d 172,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 327

(Wyo. 1982); Aguilar v. State, 764 P.2d 684,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1988); Eustice v. State, 871 P.2d 682,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1994); Kolb v. State, 930 P.2d 1238,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1996); Williams v. State, 2002 WY 136, 54 P.3d 248,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2002); Reilly v. State, 2002 WY 156, 55 P.3d 1259,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2002); Major v. State, 2004 WY 4, 83 P.3d 468,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2004); Gorseth v. State, 2006 WY 109, 141 P.3d 698,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(2006); Royball v. State, 2009 WY 79, 210 P.3d 1073,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(June 17, 2009).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For case notes, “Constitutional Law—Double Jeopardy—A Constitutional Protection or a Formality to Sidestep in Successive Prosecutions?
Harvey v. State, 835 P.2d 1074,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 661 (1993).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Kidnapping by fraud or false pretenses, 95 ALR2d 450.

Meaning of “harm” in regard to statutes increasing penalty for kidnapping where victim suffers harm, 11 ALR3d 1053.

Seizure of prison official by inmates as kidnapping, 59 ALR3d 1306.

False imprisonment as included offense with charge of kidnapping, 68 ALR3d 828.

Necessity and sufficiency of showing, in kidnapping prosecution, that detention was with intent to “secretly” confine victim, 98 ALR3d 733.

Coercion, compulsion or duress as defense to charge of kidnapping, 69 ALR4th 1005.

Validity, construction and application of “hold to service” provision of kidnapping statute, 28 ALR5th 754.

Seizure or detention for purpose of committing rape, robbery, or other offense as constituting separate crime of kidnapping, 39 ALR5th 283.

Requirement, under Federal Kidnapping Act (18 USC § 1201 (a)), that person be held “for ransom or reward or otherwise,” 71 ALR Fed 687.

§ 6-2-202.
Felonious restraint; penalty.

A person is guilty of felonious restraint if he knowingly:

Restrains another unlawfully in circumstances exposing him to risk of serious bodily injury; or

Holds another in a condition of involuntary servitude.

Felonious restraint is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Evidence sufficient.—

Evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant's felonious restraint conviction where it showed that defendant unlawfully restrained the victim in a motel room by locking the door and directing an associate to stand in front of the door to prevent the victim from leaving, and that unlawful restraint exposed the victim to being beaten up by defendant and his associate. Hurley v. State, 2017 WY 95, 401 P.3d 827,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 2017).

Serious bodily injury. —

The district court was permitted to infer that the victim had been exposed to a risk of serious bodily injury within the meaning of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-1-104(a)(x) where she was the victim of a restrained, forcible nonconsensual sexual act. Sami v. State, 2004 WY 23, 85 P.3d 1014,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2004).

Jury instructions. —

Wyoming's felonious restraint statute, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-202

, requires proof that the accused acted knowingly, meaning not only that he must have been aware that he was restraining his victim, but also that the restraint exposed the victim to physical danger, and that such was unlawful; thus the court committed plain error when it did not properly instruct the jury on the “knowingly” element and omitted the term “unlawfully” when instructing the jury. Williams v. State, 2002 WY 136, 54 P.3d 248,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2002).

District court did not abuse its discretion in refusing defendant's request for a jury instruction defining bodily injury where its instruction was sufficiently clear that serious bodily injury was more than just a scrape, cut, or physical pain, and defendant failed to explain how such an instruction equated to his purported defense that the injury was only a battery. Hurley v. State, 2017 WY 95, 401 P.3d 827,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited

in

Dean v. State, 2003 WY 128, 77 P.3d 692,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2003).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-2-203.
False imprisonment; penalties.

A person is guilty of false imprisonment if he knowingly and unlawfully restrains another so as to interfere substantially with his liberty.

False imprisonment is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to reasonable detention and interrogation of persons suspected of shoplifting, see §

6-3-405

.

As to limitation of action for false imprisonment, see §

1-3-105

.

As to recovery of costs in actions for false imprisonment, see §

1-14-125

.

As to habeas corpus generally, see §§

1-27-101

to

1-27-134

.

False imprisonment as a lesser-included offense of kidnapping.—

False imprisonment is a lesser-included offense of kidnapping; however, a trial court did not err by refusing to give such an instruction where the evidence did not support a conviction for false imprisonment. Dean v. State, 2003 WY 128, 77 P.3d 692,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2003).

In a trial for attempted kidnapping by removal, defendant was not entitled to an instruction on the lesser-included misdemeanor offense of attempted false imprisonment because attempted false imprisonment is not a lesser-included offense to attempt to commit kidnapping where the purported criminal conduct involved only an attempted removal of the victim with the intent to inflict bodily injury on or to terrorize her.
Silva v. State, 2012 WY 37, 271 P.3d 443,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2012), reh'g denied,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. Apr. 10, 2012).

Cited

in

Six Feathers v. State, 611 P.2d 857,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1980).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of state statute providing compensation for wrongful conviction and incarceration, 34 ALR4th 648.

Liability for false arrest or imprisonment under warrant as affected by mistake as to identity of person arrested, 39 ALR4th 705.

Penalties for common-law criminal offense of false imprisonment, 67 ALR4th 1103.

§ 6-2-204.
Interference with custody; presumption of knowledge of child's age; affirmative defenses; penalties.

A person is guilty of interference with custody if, having no privilege to do so, he knowingly:

Takes or entices a minor from the custody of the minor’s parent, guardian or other lawful custodian; or

Fails or refuses to return a minor to the person entitled to custody.

Proof that the child was under the age of majority gives rise to an inference that the person knew the child’s age.

It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this section that:

The action was necessary to preserve the child from an immediate danger to his welfare; or

The child was not less than fourteen (14) years old and the child was taken away or was not returned:

At his own instigation; and

Without intent to commit a criminal offense with or against the child.

Interference with custody is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years if:

The defendant is not a parent or person in equivalent relation to the child; or

The defendant knowingly conceals and harbors the child or refuses to reveal the location of the child to the parent, guardian or lawful custodian.

Interference with custody which is not punishable under subsection (d) of this section is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than two (2) years.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1984, ch. 44, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 77, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

For provisions relative to the protection of children generally, see §§

14-3-107

through

14-3-440

.

As to child abuse, see §§

14-3-205

through

14-3-208

.

For Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, see §

20-5-201

et seq.

State possesses jurisdiction to prosecute out-of-state parent. —

The state had jurisdiction to prosecute a father for interfering with child custody by failing or refusing to return the child to the custodial parent in Wyoming, even though at the time the crime was committed neither the child nor the father ever had been in the state, in view of the fact that the father's extraterritorial acts had an adverse result in Wyoming. Rios v. State, 733 P.2d 242,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 402

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 484 U.S. 833, 108 S. Ct. 108, 98 L. Ed. 2d 68, 1987 U.S. LEXIS 3773 (U.S. 1987).

Enhanced penalty does not effect whether crime of interference with custody was committed. —

The elements of the crime of interference with custody are identical under either Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-204

(d) or §

6-2-204

(e), the only difference being the additional element under § 6-2-204(d), which, if proved, provides an enhanced penalty for the crime; although defendant was charged by information with a violation of § 6-2-204(d) and the jury was instructed on interference with custody in violation of § 6-2-204(e), the absence of the additional element in § 6-2-204(d) in the jury instruction did not affect whether or not the crime of interference with custody itself was committed under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-204. Weidt v. State, 2002 WY 74, 46 P.3d 846,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Alberts v. State, 642 P.2d 447,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 315

(Wyo. 1982).

Law reviews. —

For note on kidnapping by spouse of natural child in physical custody of other spouse, see 10 Wyo. L.J. 225.

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of legal or natural parent, or one who aids and abets, for damages resulting from abduction of own child, 49 ALR4th 7.